Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall:
(a) Review, make recommendations and develop best practices related to:
(A) The recording of student absences by school districts; and
(B) School district responses to student absences that exceed 10 days.
(b) Develop a common coding system for school districts to record and report  student
absences for the purposes of ORS 339.065, with consideration  of the size and geographic lo-
cation of a school district.
(2)(a) Not later than May 31, 2026, the department shall provide a report to:
(A) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(B) The State Board of Education.
(b) The report required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
(A) Summarize the review conducted, the recommendations made and the best  practices
developed as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(B) Summarize the common coding system developed as provided by subsection  (1)(b) of
this section; and
(C) Recommend any changes in administrative  rules and legislation, including identifying
any funding needed for implementation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Enrolled Senate Bill 315 (SB 315-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 315 (SB 315-A) Page 2